Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB776.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 38.030 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Only the Governor shall have the authority to order units and members of the
Kentucky National Guard into state active duty.
(a) The Governor may order units and individual members of the Kentucky
National Guard into state active duty for any of the following purposes:
1. Protecting lives and property;
2. Assisting in disaster relief or other humanitarian efforts;
3. Preventing or suppressing riot or civil disorder;
4. Enforcing the laws of the Commonwealth; or
5. Other similar purpose.
(b) In addition to ordering personnel and units to state active duty, the Governor
may order other members of the Kentucky National Guard to participate in or
perform duty in support of state active duty missions notwithstanding the fact
that they are then entitled to receive federal pay and allowances pursuant to
Title 32 of the United States Code. The personnel may be ordered to perform
state active duty support missions either prior to, during, or after the time that
state active duty missions are planned or performed.
(c) Members of the National Guard who are ordered to perform duty as provided
in paragraph [subsection (1)](b) of this subsection[section] while they are
entitled to receive federal pay under Title 32 of the United States Code shall
have all of the powers, immunities, and benefits conferred by law upon
persons ordered to state active duty except that they shall receive no
additional pay for the duty and the provisions of KRS 38.235 shall not apply
to them. The powers, immunities, and benefits conferred upon those persons
shall be in addition to, and not in place of, those powers, immunities, and
Page 1 of 8
XXXX 2/19/2025 1:21 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1931
benefits provided under federal law.
(d) Any member of the National Guard may, with his consent, be ordered to state
active duty without pay.
(e) Any member of the Kentucky National Guard who is not serving without
pay under paragraph (d) of this subsection shall be entitled to hazardous
duty incentive pay when called to active duty service under Title 32 of the
United States Code during a state of emergency as declared by the
Governor. The Department of Military Affairs shall determine and
implement reasonable personnel pay and classification rates for hazardous
duty incentive pay as described in this paragraph.
(2) The Governor may direct the commanding officer of the military forces ordered to
state active duty to report to any civil officer, including, but not limited to, judge,
county judge/executive, mayor, sheriff, or head of law enforcement or other public
agency in whose jurisdiction the state active duty mission is to be performed. The
civil officer may advise the commanding officer regarding the specific objectives to
be accomplished by the military force, but the tactical direction and disposition of
the troops and the particular means to be employed to accomplish the mission shall
be left solely to the commanding officer of the National Guard.
(3) Troops shall not be relieved from active field service except by order of the
Governor.
(4) National Guard officers, enlisted soldiers, and airmen who are temporarily or
permanently disabled as a direct result of an injury or disease arising out of the
performance of an act in the line of duty while on state active duty shall, at the
discretion of the Governor, remain on paid state active duty status until a competent
medical authority releases them to return to their normal activities or the Governor
deems it appropriate to relieve the individual from state active duty status.
Compensation paid to the soldier or airman by the department shall be adjusted and
Page 2 of 8
XXXX 2/19/2025 1:21 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1931
maintained at the soldier's or airman's regular rate of active duty pay; however,
compensation paid by the department shall be reduced by the amount of payments
received from workers' compensation insurance, Social Security benefits, and other
federal or state-financed disability programs designed to supplement the soldier's or
airman's income. Final compensation shall not be reduced by payments for medical
care.
Section 2. KRS 138.470 is amended to read as follows:
There is expressly exempted from the tax imposed by KRS 138.460:
(1) (a) Motor vehicles titled or registered to the United States, or to the
Commonwealth of Kentucky or any of its political subdivisions; and
(b) The gross rental or lease charges for the rental or lease of a motor vehicle paid
by the United States, or the Commonwealth of Kentucky or any of its political
subdivisions;
(2) Motor vehicles titled or registered to institutions of purely public charity and
institutions of education not used or employed for gain by any person or
corporation;
(3) Motor vehicles which have been previously titled in Kentucky on or after July 1,
2005, or previously registered and titled in any state or by the federal government
when being sold or transferred to licensed motor vehicle dealers for resale. The
motor vehicles shall not be leased, rented, or loaned to any person and shall be held
for resale only;
(4) (a) Motor vehicles sold by or transferred from dealers registered and licensed in
compliance with the provisions of KRS 186.070 and KRS 190.010 to 190.080
to:
1. Members of the Armed Forces on duty in this Commonwealth under
orders from the United States government; or
2. Current members of the Kentucky National Guard or Reserve
Page 3 of 8
XXXX 2/19/2025 1:21 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1931
Component; or
(b) Motor vehicles brought into the Commonwealth that were sold by or
transferred from a licensed motor vehicle dealer in another state to a
member of the Armed Forces on duty in this Commonwealth under orders
from the United States government while that person was assigned to
temporary duty in that other state;
(5) Commercial motor vehicles, excluding passenger vehicles having a seating capacity
for nine (9) persons or less, owned by nonresident owners and used primarily in
interstate commerce and based in a state other than Kentucky which are required to
be registered in Kentucky by reason of operational requirements or fleet proration
agreements and are registered pursuant to KRS 186.145;
(6) Motor vehicles titled in Kentucky on or after July 1, 2005, or previously registered
in Kentucky, transferred between husband and wife, parent and child, stepparent
and stepchild, or grandparent and grandchild;
(7) Motor vehicles transferred when a business changes its name and no other
transaction has taken place or an individual changes his or her name;
(8) Motor vehicles transferred to a corporation from a proprietorship or limited liability
company, to a limited liability company from a corporation or proprietorship, or
from a corporation or limited liability company to a proprietorship, within six (6)
months from the time that the business is incorporated, organized, or dissolved, if
the transferor and the transferee are the same business entity except for a change in
legal form;
(9) Motor vehicles transferred by will, court order, or under the statutes covering
descent and distribution of property, if the vehicles were titled in Kentucky on or
after July 1, 2005, or previously registered in Kentucky;
(10) Motor vehicles transferred between a subsidiary corporation and its parent
corporation if there is no consideration, or nominal consideration, or in sole
Page 4 of 8
XXXX 2/19/2025 1:21 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1931
consideration of the cancellation or surrender of stock;
(11) Motor vehicles transferred between a limited liability company and any of its
members, if there is no consideration, or nominal consideration, or in sole
consideration of the cancellation or surrender of stock;
(12) The interest of a partner in a motor vehicle when other interests are transferred to
him or her;
(13) Motor vehicles repossessed by a secured party who has a security interest in effect
at the time of repossession and a repossession affidavit as required by KRS
186.045(6). The repossessor shall hold the vehicle for resale only and not for
personal use, unless he or she has previously paid the motor vehicle usage tax on
the vehicle;
(14) Motor vehicles transferred to an insurance company to settle a claim. These
vehicles shall be junked or held for resale only;
(15) Motor carriers operating under a charter bus certificate issued by the Transportation
Cabinet under KRS Chapter 281;
(16) (a) 1. Motor vehicles registered under KRS 186.050 that have a declared gross
vehicle weight with any towed unit of forty-four thousand and one
(44,001) pounds or greater; and
2. Farm trucks registered under KRS 186.050(4) that have a declared gross
vehicle weight with any towed unit of forty-four thousand and one
(44,001) pounds or greater.
(b) To be eligible for the exemption established in paragraph (a) of this
subsection, motor vehicles shall be registered at the appropriate range for the
declared gross weight of the vehicle established in KRS 186.050(3)(b) and
shall be prohibited from registering at a higher weight range. If a motor
vehicle is initially registered in one (1) declared gross weight range and
subsequently is registered at a declared gross weight range lower than forty-
Page 5 of 8
XXXX 2/19/2025 1:21 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1931
four thousand and one (44,001) pounds, the person registering the vehicle
shall be required to pay the county clerk the usage tax due on the vehicle
unless the person can provide written proof to the clerk that the tax has been
previously paid;
(17) Motor vehicles transferred to a trustee to be held in trust, or from a trustee to a
beneficiary of the trust, if a direct transfer from the grantor of the trust to all
individual beneficiaries of the trust would have qualified for an exemption from the
tax pursuant to subsection (6) or (9) of this section;
(18) Motor vehicles transferred to a trustee to be held in trust, if the grantor of the trust is
a natural person and is treated as the owner of any portion of the trust for federal
income tax purposes under the provisions of 26 U.S.C. secs. 671 to 679;
(19) Motor vehicles transferred from a trustee of a trust to another person if:
(a) The grantor of the trust is a natural person and is treated as the owner of any
portion of the trust for federal income tax purposes under the provisions of 26
U.S.C. secs. 671 to 679; and
(b) A direct transfer from the grantor of the trust to the person would have
qualified for an exemption from the tax pursuant to subsection (6) or (9) of
this section; and
(20) Motor vehicles under a manufacturer's statement of origin in possession of a
licensed new motor vehicle dealer that are titled and transferred to a licensed used
motor vehicle dealer and held for sale.
Section 3. KRS 164.5161 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) "Dependent" means an individual recognized as a dependent by a
uniformed service and verified in the Defense Enrollment Eligibility
Reporting System database.
(b) "Educational institution" means an in-state public or private postsecondary
educational institution.
Page 6 of 8
XXXX 2/19/2025 1:21 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1931
(2) (a) The General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky establishes the
National Guard Tuition Award Program to provide members of the Kentucky
National Guard and the dependents of members with the opportunity to
attend an in-state educational institution.
(b) The tuition paid shall be up to or equal to the in-state full or part-time tuition
rate of the institution the member or his or her dependent attends except that
tuition paid in support of a member or his or her dependent attending a
private postsecondary educational institution shall be up to or equal to the
average in-state full or part-time tuition rate of a public university or
community college.
(c) Until the appropriation for the tuition assistance program of the Department of
Military Affairs is first fully funded by the General Assembly, tuition for a
member or his or her dependent to attend a private institution shall not be
paid.
(d) The tuition award program shall be established in the Kentucky Higher
Education Assistance Authority, and moneys shall be available for all degree
programs, including graduate and postgraduate degree programs offered by
the institutions set out in this subsection.
(3) (a) Each member of the Kentucky National Guard and the member's
dependents shall collectively be entitled to not more than one hundred
twenty (120) hours of tuition paid for by the program.
(b) The total number of credit hours available for the member and his or her
dependents may be transferred between the current member and their
dependent and used concurrently until depleted.
(4) (a) The adjutant general may grant a current member of the Kentucky National
Guard up to forty-five (45) paid credit hours in addition to the benefit as
described in subsection (3) of this section at any postsecondary institution
Page 7 of 8
XXXX 2/19/2025 1:21 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1931
for an area of study that will have material benefits to the operations of the
National Guard.
(b) The areas of study shall be established by administrative regulations
promulgated under subsection (6) of this section.
(c) The additional hours awarded under this subsection shall not be
transferable.
(5) The Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority pursuant to KRS Chapter
13A, shall promulgate administrative regulations necessary to the financial
management of the tuition award program.
(6)[(4)] The Department of Military Affairs, pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A, shall
promulgate administrative regulations concerning the eligibility of members to
participate in the tuition award program established in this section.
Page 8 of 8
XXXX 2/19/2025 1:21 PM Jacketed